Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.015

Acquisition of out-of-state waterworks—Joint acquisition and operation.

The governing bodies of the municipalities acting jointly under RCW 35.92.014 and this section shall have authority by mutual agreement to exercise jointly all powers granted to each individual municipality in the acquisition, maintenance and operation of a water supply system.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.015. Prior: 1951 c 39 s 2. Formerly RCW 80.40.015.]